Washington statutes.
RCW 36.70.650

Board final authority.

The report and recommendation by the planning agency, whether on a proposed control initiated by it, whether on a matter referred back to it by the board for further report, or whether on a matter initiated by the board, shall be advisory only and the final determination shall rest with the board.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.70.650. Prior: 1959 c 201 s 65.]